Illinois, session 104th, HB2285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 100-1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/100-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 100-1)7    Sec. 100-1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and 8may be cited as the "Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963".9(Source: Laws 1963, p. 2836.)